Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 40 Habitual Offenders

31-40-1.
Declaration of policy.

It is declared to be the policy of Rhode Island:

To provide maximum safety for all persons who travel or otherwise use the public highways of the state;

To deny the privilege of operating motor vehicles on the highways to persons who, by their conduct and record have demonstrated their indifference for the safety and welfare of others and their disrespect for the laws of the state of Rhode Island, the orders of its courts, and the statutorily required acts of its administrative agencies; and

To discourage the repetition of criminal acts by individuals against the peace and dignity of the state of Rhode Island and its political subdivisions, and to impose increased and added deprivation of the privilege to operate motor vehicles upon habitual offenders who have been convicted repeatedly of violations of traffic laws.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 77, § 1.

31-40-2.
“Habitual offender” defined.

An “habitual offender” is any person, resident or nonresident, whose record, as maintained in the office of the division of motor vehicles, shows that the person has accumulated the convictions, or findings of delinquency or waywardness in the case of juveniles, for separate and distinct offenses, described in subdivisions (1), (2), and (3) of this section, committed within a three (3) year period, provided that where more than one included offense shall be committed within a six (6) hour period the multiple offenses shall, on the first occasion, be treated for the purposes of this article as one offense, provided the person charged has no record of prior offenses chargeable under this article, and provided further that the date of the offense most recently committed occurs within three (3) years of the date of all other offenses the conviction for which is included in subdivision (1), (2), or (3) of this section as follows:

Three (3) or more convictions, or findings of delinquency or waywardness in the case of a juvenile, singularly or in combination, of the following separate and distinct offenses arising out of separate acts:

Voluntary or involuntary manslaughter resulting from the operation of a motor vehicle;

Driving or operating a motor vehicle while under the influence of liquor or drugs in violation of §

31-27-2

;

Driving a motor vehicle while his or her license, permit, or privilege to drive a motor vehicle has been suspended or revoked in violation of §

31-27-2

.1 or chapter 11 of this title;

Willfully operating a motor vehicle without a license;

Knowingly making any false affidavit or swearing or affirming falsely to any matter or thing required by the motor vehicle laws or as to information required in the administration of the laws;

Any offense punishable as a felony under the motor vehicle laws of Rhode Island or any felony in the commission of which a motor vehicle is used;

Failure of the driver of a motor vehicle involved in an accident resulting in the death or injury of any person to stop close to the scene of the accident and report his or her identity in violation of §

31-26-1

; or

Failure of the driver of a motor vehicle involved in an accident resulting only in damage to an attended or unattended vehicle or other property in excess of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) to stop close to the scene of the accident and report his or her identity or otherwise report the accident.

Six (6) or more convictions, or findings of delinquency or waywardness in the case of a juvenile, of separate and distinct offenses, singularly or in combination, in the operation of a motor vehicle which are required to be reported to the division of motor vehicles and the commission of which requires the division of motor vehicles or authorizes a court to suspend or revoke the privilege to operate motor vehicles on the highways of this state for a period of thirty (30) days or more, and the convictions shall include those offenses enumerated in paragraph (1)(ii) of this section when taken with and added to those offenses described in this section.

The offenses included in subdivisions (1) and (2) of this section shall be deemed to include offenses under any valid town or city ordinance paralleling and substantially conforming to the state statutory provisions cited in subdivisions (1) and (2) of this section and all changes in or amendments of them, and any federal law, and law of another state or any valid town, city, or county ordinance of another state substantially conforming to those statutory provisions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 77, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 219, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 44.

31-40-3.
Transcript or abstract of conviction record.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall certify three (3) transcripts or abstracts of the conviction record as maintained in the office of the division of motor vehicles of any person whose record brings him or her within the definition of an habitual offender, as defined in §

31-40-2

, to the attorney general. The transcript or abstract shall be prima facie evidence that the person named in it was duly convicted or found delinquent or wayward in the case of a juvenile, by the court wherein the conviction or finding was made, of each offense shown by the transcript or abstract. If the person shall deny any of the facts as stated in it, he or she shall have the burden of proving that the fact is untrue.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 77, § 1.

31-40-4.
Complaint to be filed by attorney general.

The attorney general upon receiving the habitual offender transcripts or abstracts from the administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall immediately file a complaint against the person named in it in the district court having jurisdiction of criminal offenses in the city or town in which the person resides. In the event the person is a nonresident of this state, the attorney general shall file a complaint against the accused person in the district court of the sixth judicial district.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 77, § 1.

31-40-5.
Show cause order — Service — Procedure where conviction denied.

The court in which the complaint is filed shall enter an order, which incorporates the habitual offender transcript or abstract and is directed to the person named in it, to show cause why he or she should not be barred from operating a motor vehicle on the highways of this state. A copy of the show cause order and the transcript or abstract shall be served on the person named in it in the manner prescribed by law for the service of a complaint. Service on any nonresident of this state may be made on the administrator of the division of motor vehicles in the same manner as in any action or proceeding arising out of a collision on the highways of this state.

If the person denies having been convicted, or in the case of a juvenile denies that he or she was found delinquent or wayward, of any offense necessary for a holding that he or she is an habitual offender, and if the court cannot, on the evidence available to it, make the determination, the court may certify the decision of the issue to the court in which the conviction or finding of delinquency or waywardness was made. The court to which the certification is made shall immediately conduct a hearing to determine the issue and send a certified copy of its final order determining the issue to the court in which the complaint was filed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 77, § 1.

31-40-6.
Order of court.

If the court finds that the person is not the same person named in the habitual offender transcript or abstract, or that the person is not an habitual offender under this chapter, the proceeding shall be dismissed. But if the court finds that the person is the person named in the habitual offender transcript or abstract and that the person is an habitual offender, the court shall find and by appropriate order direct the person not to operate a motor vehicle on the highways of the state of Rhode Island, and to surrender to the court all licenses or permits to operate a motor vehicle on the highways of this state. The clerk of the court shall file with the division of motor vehicles a copy of the order which shall become a part of the permanent records of the division of motor vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 77, § 1.

31-40-7.
Period during which habitual offender not to be licensed.

No license to operate motor vehicles in Rhode Island shall be reissued to an habitual offender, subsequent to an order of the court as provided in §

31-40-6

:

For a period of not less than one year nor more than five (5) years from the date of the order of the court finding the person to be an habitual offender; and

Until the privilege of the person to operate a motor vehicle in this state has been restored by an order of the court of record entered in a proceeding as provided in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 77, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 173, § 1.

31-40-8.
Operation of motor vehicle by habitual offender prohibited — Penalty — Enforcement of section.

It shall be unlawful for any person to operate any motor vehicle in this state while the order of the court prohibiting the operation is in effect. The operation may be punished by imprisonment of not more than five (5) years. No portion of the sentence shall be suspended or deferred, except that in cases where the operation is necessitated in situations of apparent extreme emergency which require the operation to save life or limb, the sentence, or any part of it may be suspended or deferred.

For the purpose of enforcing this section, in any case in which the accused is charged with driving a motor vehicle while his or her license, permit, or privilege to drive is suspended or revoked, or who is charged with driving without a license, the court before hearing the charge shall determine whether the person has been held an habitual offender and by reason of the holding, is barred from operating a motor vehicle on the highways of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 77, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 219, § 2.

31-40-9.
Restoration of privilege of operating motor vehicle.

At the expiration of the time of suspension set by the court under §

31-40-7

after the date of any final order of a court entered under the provisions of this chapter, finding a person to be an habitual offender and directing him or her not to operate a motor vehicle in this state, the person may petition that court, or any district court having criminal jurisdiction in the political subdivision in which the person then resides, for restoration of his or her privilege to operate a motor vehicle in this state. Upon the petition, and for good cause shown, the court may, in its discretion, restore to the person the privilege to operate a motor vehicle in this state upon any terms and conditions that the court may prescribe, subject to other provisions of law relating to the issuance of operators’ or chauffeurs’ licenses.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 77, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 224, § 1.

31-40-10.
Appeals.

An appeal may be had from any final action or order of a court entered under the provisions of this chapter in the same manner and form as such an appeal would be claimed and adjudicated in any criminal case.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 77, § 1.

31-40-11.
Construction of chapter.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as amending, modifying, or repealing any existing law of Rhode Island or any existing ordinance of any city or town relating to the operation of motor vehicles, the licensing of persons to operate motor vehicles, or providing penalties for the violation of provisions regarding them, or shall be construed to preclude the exercise of the regulatory powers of any division, agency, department, or political subdivision of the state having the statutory power to regulate this operation and licensing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 77, § 1.

31-40-12.
Authority of administrator of the division of motor vehicles.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as limiting, modifying, or reducing the authority of the administrator of the division of motor vehicles in any way, and nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed as affecting any of the provisions of chapter 11 of this title entitled “Suspension or revocation of licenses — Violations,” or as affecting the provisions of §

31-27-2.1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 77, § 1.

31-40-13.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Rhode Island Habitual Offender Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 77, § 1.